District of Columbia statutes.
50-2203.02

Negligent homicide included in manslaughter where death due to operation of vehicle.

The crime of negligent homicide defined in § 50-2203.01 shall be deemed to be included within every crime of manslaughter charged to have been committed in the operation of any vehicle, and in any case where a defendant is charged with manslaughter committed in the operation of any vehicle, if the jury shall find the defendant not guilty of the crime of manslaughter such jury may, in its discretion, render a verdict of guilty of negligent homicide.

Mar. 3, 1901, ch. 854, § 802(b)
June 17, 1935, 49 Stat. 385, ch. 266
This section is referenced in § 50-2203.03.
1981 Ed., § 40-714.
1973 Ed., § 40-607.